Washington statutes.
RCW 15.13.410

Shipments into state to be marked or tagged.

Each shipment of horticultural plants transported or shipped into the state and/or offered for retail sale within the state shall be legibly marked or tagged in a conspicuous manner.

The director may, whenever the director finds that any horticultural plant is not properly marked, order it off sale until it is properly marked, or order that it be returned to the consignor for proper marking.

[ 2000 c 144 s 19; 1993 c 120 s 11; 1990 c 261 s 10; 1971 ex.s. c 33 s 17.]